Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 6 Nonprofit Corporations Generally [Repealed]

§§ 17-6-101 through 17-6-117.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1992, ch. 53, § 3.

Cross references. —

For the Wyoming Nonprofit Corporation Act, see chapter 19 of this title, especially §§

17-19-1803

and

17-19-1805

.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1959, ch. 189, §§ 1 through 9; Laws 1961, ch. 87, §§ 1 through 5; Laws 1963, ch. 176, §§ 1 and 2; and Laws 1965, ch. 164, § 1, related to nonprofit corporations.